Alaska statutes. Title 29. Municipal Government.
Article 1. Regular and Special Elections.

Collateral references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d, Elections, § 1 et seq.

56 Am. Jur. 2d, Municipal Corporations, Counties, and Other Political Subdivisions, §§ 129, 218.

29 C.J.S., Elections, § 1 et seq.

62 C.J.S., Municipal Corporations, §§ 213 — 219, 311 — 327, 354.

Sec. 29.26.010.
Administration.

The governing body shall prescribe the rules for conducting an election.

For an election in which voters cast ballots at polling places in their precincts, the governing body shall appoint an election board composed of at least three judges for each precinct. If the governing body appoints an election board, a judge shall be a voter of the precinct for which appointed unless no voter is willing to serve.

History.

(§ 9 ch 74 SLA 1985; am § 2 ch 44 SLA 2014)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2014 amendment, effective September 17, 2014, added the (a) and (b) designations, and, in (b), substituted “For an election in which voters cast ballots at polling places in their precincts, the governing body” for “and” at the beginning of the first sentence, and substituted “If the governing body appoints an election board, a” for “A”
at the beginning of the second sentence.

Collateral references. —

25 Am. Jur. 2d, Elections, § 1 et seq.

29 C.J.S., Elections, § 1 et seq.

Sec. 29.26.020.
Nominations.

Subject to other provisions of this title, the governing body shall provide by ordinance for nominations of elected officials by providing for declaration of candidacy or for petition requiring the signatures of not more than 10 voters, or for both.

A person may be nominated for and occupy more than one office, but may not serve simultaneously as borough mayor and as a member of the assembly or, in a first class city, as city mayor and as a member of the council.

History.

(§ 9 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Administrative Code. —

For administration of local and regional elections, see 6 AAC 27.

Sec. 29.26.030.
Notice of elections.

Subject to other provisions of this title, a municipality shall give at least 20 days notice of an election.

This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 9 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.26.040.
Date of regular election.

The date of a regular election is the first Tuesday of October annually, unless a different date or interval of years is provided by ordinance.

History.

(§ 9 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.26.050.
Voter qualification.

A person may vote in a municipal election only if the person

is qualified to vote in state elections under AS

15.05.010

;

has been a resident of the municipality for 30 days immediately preceding the election;

is registered to vote in state elections at a residence address within a municipality at least 30 days before the municipal election at which the person seeks to vote; and

is not disqualified under art. V of the state constitution.

Voter registration by the municipality may not be required. However, in order to vote for a candidate or on a ballot measure relating to a specific local election district or service area, a municipality may by ordinance require that a person be registered to vote in state elections at least 30 days before the municipal election at an address within the boundaries of that local election district or service area. The municipality has the responsibility to determine if a voter meets the requirements of the ordinance and this section.

This section applies to home rule and general law municipalities.

History.

(§ 9 ch 74 SLA 1985; am §§ 7, 8 ch 80 SLA 1989; am § 88 ch 82 SLA 2000)

Cross references. —

For voter qualifications generally, see AS 15.05.

Sec. 29.26.060.
Runoff elections.

Unless otherwise provided by ordinance, a runoff election shall be held if no candidate receives over 40 percent of the votes cast for the office of

mayor; or

member of the governing body or school board if candidates run for a designated seat.

Unless otherwise provided by ordinance, if candidates for the governing body or school board run at large, a runoff election for a seat shall be held if no candidate receives a number of votes greater than 40 percent of the total votes cast for all candidates divided by the number of seats to be filled.

Unless otherwise provided by ordinance, a runoff election shall be held within three weeks after the date of certification of the election for which a runoff is required, and notice of the runoff election shall be published at least five days before the election date. The runoff election shall be between the two candidates receiving the greatest number of votes for the seat.

History.

(§ 9 ch 74 SLA 1985)

Sec. 29.26.070.
Election contest and appeal.

The governing body may provide by ordinance the time and procedure for the contest of an election.

Unless otherwise provided by ordinance, an election may be contested only by a voter by filing a written affidavit with the municipal clerk specifying with particularity the grounds for the contest. An election may be contested before or during the first canvass of ballots by the governing body.

Unless otherwise provided by ordinance, the governing body shall declare the election results at the first meeting to canvass the election, record the results in the minutes of that meeting, and authorize the results to be certified.

A contestant shall pay all costs and expenses incurred in a recount of an election demanded by the contestant if the recount fails to reverse a result of the election, or the difference between the winning and losing vote on the result contested is more than two percent.

A person may not appeal or seek judicial review of an election for any cause unless the person is a voter, has exhausted all administrative remedies before the governing body, and has commenced, within 10 days after the governing body has declared the election results, an action in the superior court in the judicial district in which the municipality is located. If court action is not commenced within the 10-day period, the election and election results are conclusive and valid.

History.

(§ 9 ch 74 SLA 1985)